New York, session 2025-2026, S9053.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. 1. The commissioner of health shall conduct a comprehensive 2 study on kratom. Such study shall include, but not be limited to, poten- 3 tial health risks, benefits, and effects of kratom use by humans. 4 2. The commissioner of health shall submit a report on such commis- 5 sioner's findings and any recommendations pursuant to such study to the 6 governor, the speaker of the assembly, the minority leader of the assem- 7 bly, the temporary president of the senate, and the minority leader of 8 the senate no later than one year following the effective date of this 9 act. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14619-01-6